Utah statutes.
41-12a-104.   Rules of construction.

(1)  If a person maintains owner's security under this chapter, it does not limit his liability to the face amount of the owner's security.

(2)  Nothing in this chapter prevents the plaintiff in any action at law from relying for relief upon the other processes provided by law.

(3)  This chapter is cumulative with the requirements of the laws of this state requiring policies of motor vehicle insurance against liability.   This subsection does not preclude compliance through a single policy which, by its terms or by an appropriate endorsement, satisfies the requirements of both applicable laws.



Amended by Chapter 204, 1986 General Session

